Arkansas, session 2025, HB1966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, Subchapter 14, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-13-1419. Establishment of public elementary school — Required
following certain consolidations.
(a) An incorporated town or a city of the second class and the parents
of, legal guardians of, and persons standing in loco parentis to students
within an affected district may file a written appeal with a receiving
district board of directors for the establishment of a local public
elementary school or satellite school associated with an affected district's
existing school campus, to be located within the boundaries of the
incorporated town or city of the second class, if the:
*TNL145*
04/01/2025 1:56:57 PM TNL145

HB1966
(1) Affected district included a public school that was
configured as an elementary school;
(2) Affected district is within the boundaries of the
incorporated town or city of the second class;
(3) Affected district resulted in a consolidation within the
last twenty (20) years from the effective date of this section; and
(3) Incorporated town or city of the second class has the means
of providing adequate school facilities.
(b) If a receiving school district board of directors approves the
written appeal of an incorporated town or a city of the second class under
subsection (a) of this section, the receiving school district board of
directors and the incorporated town or city of the second class shall jointly
file an appeal with the State Board of Education for the establishment of a
local public elementary school or satellite school associated with an
affected district's existing school campus, to be located within the
boundaries of the incorporated town or city of the second class.
(c)(1) A local public elementary school established in an affected
district under subsection (b) of this section shall be part of the receiving
district.
(2) The receiving district and the incorporated town or city of
the second class may enter into a written agreement for the provision of in-
kind contributions from the incorporated town or city of the second class to
the receiving district for purposes of establishing and maintaining the local
public elementary school or satellite school established in the affected
district under this section.











04/01/2025 1:56:57 PM TNL145